Utah statutes.
34-40-102.   Definitions.
(1)  This chapter and the terms used in it, including the computation of
wages, shall be interpreted consistently with 29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq., the
Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, to the extent that act relates
to the payment of a minimum wage.
(2)  As used in this chapter:
(a)  "Cash wage obligation" means an hourly wage that an employer pays a
tipped employee regardless of the tips or gratuities a tipped employee
receives.
(b)  "Commission" means the Labor Commission.
(c)  "Division" means the Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor in the
commission.
(d)  "Minimum wage" means the state minimum hourly wage for adult employees as
established under this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise.
(e)  "Tipped employee" means an employee who customarily and regularly
receives tips or gratuities.
